Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-1305
Local board;
terms; vacancy.

All local board members shall
be appointed for terms of three years. If a vacancy occurs on a local board,
the executive director of the office shall
appoint another person to serve the unexpired portion of the term. Appointments
to fill vacancies on the local board shall be made in the same manner and
subject to the same conditions as the initial appointments to such board.
The term of each member shall expire on the second Monday in July of the appropriate
year. Members shall continue to serve until a successor is appointed.

Laws 1982, LB 714, § 5;

Laws 1999, LB 240, § 3;

Laws 2012, LB998, § 7.